en: Faucets
xx: Faucets
cs: Vodovodní baterie
da: Vandhaner
de: Armaturen
es: Grifos
fr: Robinets, Robinet
it: Rubinetteria
ja: 蛇口
nl: Mengkranen
no: Kraner
pl: Baterie
pt: Torneiras
ru: Краны
sv: Kranar
tr: Musluklar

en: Shower Stalls & Kits
xx: Shower Stalls & Kits
cs: Sprchové kouty a komplety
da: Brusekabiner og -sæt
de: Duschkabinen
es: Kits y platos de ducha
fr: Cabines et kits de douche
it: Cabine e kit per doccia
ja: シャワールーム組み立てキット
nl: Douchecabines en -sets
no: Dusjkabinetter og -sett
pl: Kabiny i zestawy prysznicowe
pt: Boxes para banheiro
ru: Душевые кабины и комплекты для них
sv: Duschkabiner och -kit
tr: Duş Tekneleri ve Setleri

en: Sinks
xx: Sinks
cs: Dřezy a umyvadla
da: Vaske
de: Waschbecken & Spülen
es: Lavabos y fregaderos
fr: Éviers et lavabos
it: Lavandini
ja: シンク
nl: Gootstenen
no: Vasker
pl: Zlewy i umywalki
pt: Pias
ru: Раковины
sv: Tvättställ
tr: Lavabolar

en: Bathroom Sinks
xx: Bathroom Sinks
cs: Umyvadla
da: Badeværelsesvaske
de: Badezimmerwaschbecken
es: Lavabos
fr: Lavabos
it: Lavandini bagno
ja: 洗面ボウル
nl: Gootstenen voor badkamers
no: Baderomsvasker
pl: Umywalki łazienkowe
pt: Pias de banheiro
ru: Умывальники
sv: Handfat
tr: Banyo Lavaboları

en: Kitchen & Utility Sinks
xx: Kitchen & Utility Sinks
cs: Kuchyňské dřezy
da: Køkkenvaske og arbejdsvaske
de: Küchenspülen & Spülbecken
es: Fregaderos
fr: Éviers & Plonges
it: Lavandini cucina
ja: キッチンシンク
nl: Gootstenen voor keukens
no: Kjøkken- og bruksvasker
pl: Zlewy kuchenne i użytkowe
pt: Pias de cozinha
ru: Кухонные и хозяйственные мойки
sv: Diskhoar
tr: Mutfak ve Yıkama Evyeleri

en: Toilets & Bidets
xx: Toilets & Bidets
cs: Záchody a bidety
da: Toiletter og bideter
de: Toiletten & Bidets
es: Baños y bidés
fr: Toilettes et bidets
it: WC e bidet
ja: トイレ・ビデ
nl: Toiletten en bidetten
no: Toaletter og bideter
pl: Toalety i bidety
pt: Privadas e bidês
ru: Унитазы и биде
sv: Toaletter och bidéer
tr: Tuvaletler ve Bideler

en: Bidets
xx: Bidets
cs: Bidety
da: Bideter
de: Bidets
es: Bidés
fr: Bidets
it: Bidet
ja: 温水洗浄便座・ビデ
nl: Bidets
no: Bideter
pl: Bidety
pt: Bidês
ru: Биде
sv: Bidéer
tr: Bideler

en: Toilets
xx: Toilets
cs: Záchody
da: Toiletter
de: Toiletten
es: Baños
fr: Toilettes
it: WC
ja: 便器
nl: Toiletten
no: Toaletter
pl: Toalety
pt: Privadas
ru: Унитазы
sv: Toaletter
tr: Tuvaletler

en: Urinals
xx: Urinals
cs: Pisoáry
da: Urinaler
de: Urinale
es: Urinarios
fr: Urinoirs
it: Orinatoi
ja: 男性用小便器
nl: Urinoirs
no: Urinaler
pl: Pisuary
pt: Mictórios
ru: Писсуары
sv: Urinoarer
tr: Pisuvarlar

en: Plumbing Hoses & Supply Lines
xx: Plumbing Hoses & Supply Lines
cs: Vodovodní hadice a PE potrubí
da: Rørslanger
de: Schläuche & Leitungen
es: Conductos de abastecimiento y mangueras
fr: Tuyaux de plomberie et arrivées d'eau
it: Tubi e flessibili
ja: ホース・配管
nl: Slangen en leidingen voor loodgieterswerk
no: Avløps- og tilkoblingsslanger
pl: Węże i przewody hydrauliczne
pt: Mangueiras e linhas de suprimento
ru: Сантехнические шланги и трубы
sv: Slangar och anslutningsslangar
tr: Tesisat Hortumları ve İkmal Hatları

en: Plumbing Pipes
xx: Plumbing Pipes
cs: Instalatérské trubky
da: Sanitetsrør
de: Installationsrohre
es: Tuberías de fontanería
fr: Tuyaux de plomberie
it: Tubature idrauliche
ja: 配管パイプ
nl: Waterleidingen
no: Sanitærrør
pl: Rury hydrauliczne
pt: Tubos para encanamento
ru: Водопроводные трубы
sv: VVS-rör
tr: Sıhhi Tesisat Boruları

en: Plumbing Repair Kits
xx: Plumbing Repair Kits
cs: Sady na opravy a údržbu potrubí
da: Rørreparationssæt
de: Sanitär-Reparatursätze
es: Kits de reparación para fontanería
fr: Trousses de plomberie
it: Kit per riparazioni idrauliche
ja: 配管修理キット
nl: Reparatiesets voor loodgieterswerk
no: Rørreparasjonssett
pl: Zestawy do naprawy hydrauliki
pt: Kits para reparos de encanamento
ru: Сантехнические ремонтные комплекты
sv: Reparationskit - rörmokeri
tr: Boru Tamir Malzemeleri

en: Water Dispensing & Filtration
xx: Water Dispensing & Filtration
cs: Dávkování a filtrace vody
da: Vanddispensere og filtrering
de: Trinkwasserspender & Filter
es: Filtración y distribución de agua
fr: Distribution et filtration de l'eau
it: Distribuzione/filtro acqua
ja: ウォーターサーバー・浄水器
nl: Waterdispensers en -filters
no: Vann og filtrering
pl: Dystrybucja i filtrowanie wody
pt: Distribuição e filtragem de água
ru: Оборудование для розлива и фильтрации воды
sv: Vattenautomater och vattenfiltrering
tr: Su Dağıtım ve Arıtma Sistemleri

en: In-Line Water Filters
xx: In-Line Water Filters
cs: Vodovodní filtry
da: Indbyggede vandfiltre
de: Wasserleitungsfilter
es: Filtros de agua en línea
fr: Filtres à eau en ligne
it: Filtri acqua integrati
ja: インラインフィルター
nl: Leidingfilters
no: Rør-vannfiltre
pl: Filtry narurowe
pt: Filtros de água em linha
ru: Встроенные фильтры для очистки воды
sv: Inline-vattenfilter
tr: Şebeke Girişine Takılan Su Arıtma Filtreleri

en: Water Dispensers
xx: Water Dispensers
cs: Zásobníky pitné vody
da: Vanddispenser
de: Wasserspender
es: Dispensadores de agua
fr: Distributeurs d'eau fraîche
it: Distributori d'acqua
ja: ウォーターサーバー
nl: Waterdispensers
no: Vanndispensere
pl: Dystrybutory wody
pt: Suportes para água
ru: Диспенсеры для воды
sv: Vattenautomater
tr: Su Sebilleri

en: Drinking Fountains
xx: Drinking Fountains
cs: Vodovodní pítka
da: Drikkefontæner
de: Trinkbrunnen
es: Fuentes para beber
fr: Fontaines à eau potable
it: Fontanelle
ja: 水飲み器
nl: Drinkfonteintjes
no: Drikkefontener
pl: Fontanny z wodą pitną
pt: Fontes de água potável
ru: Питьевые фонтанчики
sv: Dricksvattenfontäner
tr: Çeşmeler

en: Water Chillers
xx: Water Chillers
cs: Chladicí zařízení na vodu
da: Vandafkølere
de: Wasserkühler
es: Enfriadores de agua
fr: Refroidisseurs industriels
it: Refrigeratori ad acqua
ja: ウォーターチラー
nl: Koudwatermachines
no: Vannkjølere
pl: Chłodziarki do wody
pt: Resfriadores de água
ru: Водоохладители
sv: Kylanordning för vatten
tr: Su Soğutucular

en: Water Distillers
xx: Water Distillers
cs: Čističe vody
da: Vanddestillationsapparater
de: Wasserdestillationsgeräte
es: Destiladores de agua
fr: Distillateurs d'eau
it: Distillatori acqua
ja: 蒸留式浄水器
nl: Waterdestilleerders
no: Vanndestillatorer
pl: Destylatory wody
pt: Destiladores de água
ru: Опреснители
sv: Vattendestillatorer
tr: Su Damıtıcılar

en: Water Filtration Accessories
xx: Water Filtration Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k vodním filtrům
da: Vandfiltrering – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Wasserfilter
es: Accesorios para filtro de agua
fr: Accessoires de filtration de l'eau
it: Accessori per filtro acqua
ja: 浄水器関連用品
nl: Waterfilteraccessoires
no: Tilbehør til vannfiltrering
pl: Akcesoria do filtrowania wody
pt: Acessórios para filtragem de água
ru: Принадлежности для фильтрации воды
sv: Tillbehör till vattenfiltrering
tr: Su Arıtma Cihazı Aksesuarları

en: Water Filter Cartridges
xx: Water Filter Cartridges
cs: Patrony do vodních filtrů
da: Vandfilterbeholdere
de: Wasserfilterkartuschen
es: Cartuchos de filtro de agua
fr: Cartouches pour filtres à eau
it: Cartucce filtri acqua
ja: 浄水器カートリッジ
nl: Waterfiltercartridges
no: Vannfiltreringskassetter
pl: Wkłady do filtrów wody
pt: Cartuchos para filtro de água
ru: Картриджи фильтров для воды
sv: Vattenfilterpatroner
tr: Su Arıtma Cihazı Kartuşları